New Jersey, session 221, A612.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The president of each public institution of higher education, or his designee, shall report to the governing board of the institution, at each of its regular meetings, all crimes, fires, and other emergencies which occurred on campus during the previous reporting period.  The report shall include: a count and classification of all criminal incidents which occurred on campus and which were recorded by campus security and campus or local police departments; a list of campus alerts, threats, or emergencies which occurred on campus; and a count and classification of all fire incidents which occurred on campus and which were recorded by campus security and local fire departments.  The report may also include: the status of all investigations of such acts or events, the type and nature of any discipline imposed on any student or employee identified as causing or contributing to an act or event; and any other measures imposed, training conducted, or programs implemented, to reduce the incidence of such acts and events. For all matters in the report not subject to public inspection, examination, or copying under the provisions of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.); any other statute; regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or Executive Order of the Governor; Executive Order of the Governor; or any federal law, federal regulation, or federal order, such matters shall be reported by the president to the board in an executive session and such reporting shall not render the information a government record available for inspection under the provisions of  P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.); any other statute; regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or Executive Order of the Governor; Executive Order of the Governor; or any federal law, federal regulation, or federal order. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.